Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 15. Uniform Interstate Compact on Juveniles.
Sec. 47.15.020.
Juvenile compact administrator.

Under the compact established under AS

47.15.010

, the commissioner of health and social services may designate an officer as the compact administrator. The compact administrator shall cooperate with all departments, agencies, and officers of and in the government of this state and its subdivisions in facilitating the proper administration of the compact or of a supplementary agreement entered into by this state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 37 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the first sentence, which read, “Under the compact, the governor may designate an officer as the compact administrator.”; and deleted the second and third sentences, which read, “The administrator, acting jointly with like officers of other party states, shall adopt regulations to carry out more effectively the terms of the compact. The compact administrator serves subject to the pleasure of the governor.”

Sec. 47.15.025.
State council.

The State Council for Interstate Adult and Juvenile Offender Supervision created in AS

33.36.140

shall serve as the state council under AS

47.15.010

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 37 SLA 2009)

Effective dates. —

Section 14, ch. 37, SLA 2009, makes this section effective July 1, 2009.

Sec. 47.15.030.
Supplementary agreements.

The compact administrator may make supplementary agreements with appropriate officials of other states pursuant to the compact.
If a supplementary agreement requires or contemplates the use of an institution or facility of this state or requires or contemplates the provision of a service of this state, the supplementary agreement has no force or effect until approved by the head of the department or agency under whose jurisdiction the institution is operated, or whose department or agency is charged with performing the service.

History.

(§ 3 ch 88 SLA 1960)

Sec. 47.15.035.
Regulations.

The Department of Health and Social Services may adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 7 ch 37 SLA 2009)

Effective dates. —

Section 14, ch. 37, SLA 2009, makes this section effective July 1, 2009.

Sec. 47.15.040.
Financial arrangements.

The compact administrator, subject to the approval of the commissioner of administration, may make or arrange for the payments necessary to discharge the financial obligations imposed upon this state by the compact or by a supplementary agreement made under the compact.

History.

(§ 4 ch 88 SLA 1960)

Sec. 47.15.050.
Appointment of attorney or guardian. [Repealed, § 10 ch 37 SLA 2009.]

Sec. 47.15.060.
Enforcement.

The courts, departments, agencies and officers of this state and its subdivisions shall enforce this compact and shall do all things appropriate to the effectuation of its purposes and intent which are within their respective jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1960)

Sec. 47.15.070.
Additional procedures not precluded.

In addition to the procedures provided under AS

47.15.010

for the return of a runaway juvenile, the states that are participants to the compact, the juvenile, the juvenile’s parents or other legal custodian, or the courts of the participating states may agree upon and adopt any plan or procedure legally authorized under the laws of this state and the other respective party states for the return of the runaway juvenile.

History.

(§ 7 ch 88 SLA 1960; am § 8 ch 37 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, substituted “under AS

47.15.010

” for “in articles IV and VI of the compact”, and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 47.15.080.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Interstate Compact for Juveniles.

History.

(§ 8 ch 88 SLA 1960; am § 9 ch 37 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, substituted “Interstate Compact for Juveniles” for “Uniform Interstate Compact on Juveniles”.